Florida, session 2026, SB1588.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âSection 18 of chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida, 29 is repealed. 30 Section 2.âParagraphs (c) and (f) of subsection (1) and 31 paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 215.986, Florida 32 Statues, are amended to read: 33 215.986âGold and silver coin as legal tender.â 34 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 35 (c)ââGold coinâ means a precious metal with the chemical 36 element of atomic number 79 in solid form, in the shape of 37 rounds, bars, ingots, or bullion coins, which is valued for its 38 metal content and stamped or imprinted with its weight and 39 purity and which solid form of chemical element atomic number 79 40 consists of at least 99.5 percent purity. The purity requirement 41 applies to the entire coin or item as a single unit and not to 42 any isolated component or embedded portion of the gold. The term 43 does not include items that incorporate gold within nonmetal 44 substrates, including, but not limited to, polymer, plastic, 45 paper, or other composite materials, regardless of the purity of 46 the gold component. The term also does not include any goods as 47 defined in s. 672.105(1), such as jewelry; other items of 48 utility, such as picture frames; or collectibles. 49 (f)ââSilver coinâ means a precious metal with the chemical 50 element of atomic number 47 in solid form, in the shape of 51 rounds, bars, ingots, or bullion coins, which is valued for its 52 metal content and is stamped or imprinted with its weight and 53 purity and which solid form of chemical element atomic number 47 54 consists of at least 99.9 percent purity. The purity requirement 55 applies to the entire coin or item as a single unit and not to 56 any isolated component or embedded portion of the silver. The 57 term does not include items that incorporate silver within 58 nonmetal substrates, including, but not limited to, polymer, 59 plastic, paper, or other composite materials, regardless of the 60 purity of the silver component. The term also does not mean any 61 goods as defined in s. 672.105(1), such as jewelry; other items 62 of utility, such as picture frames; or collectibles. 63 (2)âLEGAL TENDER.âGold coin and silver coin that meet the 64 requirements of this section are recognized as legal tender by 65 this state for the payment of debts incurred on or after July 1, 66 2026. 67 (a)âGold coin or silver coin recognized as legal tender in 68 this section may not be imprinted, stamped, or otherwise marked 69 with any name, symbol, or other information or design, 70 indicating the face value of the coin in the official currency 71 of any government, or with a countryâs name on the coin or 72 phrases implying governmental issuance or that the coin was 73 minted by a government mint. including, but not limited to, any 74 suggestion that such coin has been minted or issued by any 75 government, Except as prohibited in this paragraph, the that 76 such coin must be imprinted, stamped, or otherwise marked with 77 the coinâs weight and purity and may be imprinted, stamped, or 78 otherwise marked with the name or symbol that identifies any 79 refiner or mint of the gold coin or silver coin. Additional 80 artistic or decorative designs, such as images of animals, 81 historical figures, or patterns, are permitted if they are 82 integral to the coinâs surface and do not imply governmental 83 issuance as provided in this paragraph, and if the coin 84 otherwise meets the purity and form requirements in subsection 85 (1). A gold coin or silver coin that does not meet the 86 requirements of this paragraph is not recognized as legal tender 87 for the payment of debts in this state. 88 Section 3.âSubsections (13), (19), and (26) of section 89 560.103, Florida Statutes, as amended by chapter 2025-100, Laws 90 of Florida, are amended to read: 91 560.103âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 92 (13)ââCustodian of gold coin or silver coinâ or 93 âcustodian,â as used for purposes of transactional gold or 94 silver, means any person or entity providing secure vault 95 facilities to one or more persons for the safekeeping and 96 storage of gold coin or silver coin, the ownership of which is 97 intended to be capable of electronic transfer or may be 98 transferred electronically as defined in s. 215.986(1) for legal 99 tender as defined in s. 215.986(1). The term includes any person 100 who holds gold coin or silver coin for more than 10 days. The 101 term does not include a person who holds gold coin or silver 102 coin for personal use as legal tender or an individual or entity 103 that holds gold or silver that is not intended to be used as 104 legal tender. For purposes of this subsection, the term 105 âtransactional gold or silverâ means gold or silver held by a 106 third party which is intended to be used, transferred, or 107 exchanged as legal tender in a commercial or financial 108 transaction through electronic or digital means. 109 (19)ââForeign currency exchangerâ means a person who 110 exchanges, for compensation, currency of the United States or a 111 foreign government, gold coin, or silver coin to currency of 112 another government. 113 (26)ââMoney transmitterâ means a corporation, limited 114 liability company, limited liability partnership, or foreign 115 entity qualified to do business in this state which: 116 (a)âreceives currency, monetary value, a payment 117 instrument, gold coin, silver coin, or virtual currency for the 118 purpose of acting as an intermediary to transmit currency, 119 monetary value, a payment instrument, gold coin, silver coin, or 120 virtual currency from one person to another location or person 121 by any means, including transmission by wire, facsimile, 122 electronic transfer, courier, the Internet, or through bill 123 payment services or other businesses that facilitate such 124 transfer within this country, or to or from this country. The 125 term includes only an intermediary that has the ability to 126 unilaterally execute or indefinitely prevent a transaction; or 127 (b) Acts as a custodian of gold coin or silver coin. 128 Section 4.âSubsection (1) of section 560.109, Florida 129 Statutes, as amended by chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida, is 130 amended to read: 131 560.109âExaminations and investigations.âThe office may 132 conduct examinations and investigations, within or outside this 133 state to determine whether a person has violated any provision 134 of this chapter and related rules, or of any practice or conduct 135 that creates the likelihood of material loss, insolvency, or 136 dissipation of the assets of a money services business or 137 otherwise materially prejudices the interests of their 138 customers. 139 (1)âThe office may, without advance notice, examine or 140 investigate each licensee as often as is warranted for the 141 protection of customers and in the public interest. However, the 142 office must examine each licensee at least once every 5 years, 143 except that a money services business that transmits custodian 144 of gold coin or silver coin must be examined at least annually. 145 The office may, without advance notice, examine or investigate a 146 money services business, authorized vendor, affiliated party, or 147 license applicant at any time if the office suspects that the 148 money services business, authorized vendor, affiliated party, or 149 license applicant has violated or is about to violate any 150 provision of this chapter or any criminal law of this state or 151 of the United States. 152 Section 5.âSubsection (3) of section 560.141, Florida 153 Statutes, as amended by chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida, is 154 amended to read: 155 560.141âLicense application.â 156 (3)âThe office shall conduct an examination of the 157 applicant, including, but not limited to, the custodianâs vault 158 facilities, before issuing a license to determine the 159 applicantâs ability to conduct business immediately upon opening 160 for business. 161 Section 6.âSubsection (1) of section 560.155, Florida 162 Statutes, as amended by chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida, is 163 amended to read: 164 560.155âGold and silver coin as legal tender.â 165 (1)âA money services business may not be required to 166 transmit offer products or services, including, but not limited 167 to, transmitting, storing, exchanging, or accepting payment in 168 gold coin or silver coin. To the extent that a money services 169 business offers such transmissions products or services, the 170 money services business must do all of the following, as 171 applicable: 172 (a)âExcept as provided in s. 560.214, Maintain separate 173 accounts for any gold coin or silver coin and not commingle such 174 gold coin or silver coin with any other accounts that hold coin 175 or currency of the United States or of another country. 176 (b)âInsure the gold coin or silver coin, if not otherwise 177 insured by a an independent custodian of gold coin or silver 178 coin pursuant to s. 560.214(1)(i), for 100 percent of the full 179 replacement value under an all-risk insurance policy issued by a 180 nongovernmental operated insurer that is an authorized insurer 181 or eligible surplus lines insurer. A licensee relying on 182 insurance provided by the custodian must independently verify 183 the insurance coverage is current and active. 184 (c)âSecurely store and safeguard all physical gold coin or 185 silver coin with a custodian of gold coin or silver coin within 186 this state. 187 (d)âEnsure that any gold coin or silver coin that is 188 purchased for use or circulation as legal tender is from an 189 accredited refiner or wholesaler as prescribed by commission 190 rule which certifies that the gold coin or silver coin being 191 purchased meets the requirements of gold coin and silver coin. 192 (e)âMake disclosures to a customer at the inception of the 193 relationship for providing products or services relating to gold 194 coin or silver coin before a customer initially purchases or 195 uses a money services business product or service relating to 196 such coin, prescribed on a form adopted by the commission. The 197 commission must adopt rules to prescribe the general form of 198 such disclosures. Such disclosures must include, at a minimum, 199 all of the following: 200 1.âNotice that the value of gold coin or silver coin will 201 fluctuate over time and that such customer should seek 202 professional advice about whether transacting in gold coin or 203 silver coin may incur a federal capital gains tax. 204 2.âNotice of potential fees that may be incurred for 205 converting gold coin or silver coin to United States dollars or 206 other currency, or any other transaction fees that may be 207 incurred which can be incorporated by referencing the companyâs 208 terms and conditions. 209 3.âAny additional disclosures the commission deems 210 necessary for the protection of any person or entity that 211 tenders or accepts gold coin or silver coin for the payment of 212 debts, taxes, charges, or dues. 213 (f)âProvide transparent contracts, products, services, 214 storage terms, and fees, including, but not limited to, 215 purchase, sale, conversion, storage, delivery, transaction, or 216 other fees. The spot rate at which any gold coin or silver coin 217 is converted must be disclosed at the time that the gold coin or 218 silver coin is converted. 219 (g)âComply with chain of custody requirements, as 220 prescribed by commission rule. 221 (h)âComply with all other applicable state and federal laws 222 and regulations. 223 Section 7.âSection 560.205, Florida Statutes, as amended by 224 chapter 2025-100, Laws of Florida, is amended to read: 225 560.205âAdditional license application requirements.âIn 226 addition to the license application requirements under part I of 227 this chapter, an applicant seeking a license under this part 228 must also submit all of the following information any 229 information required to be submitted by each applicant under the 230 relevant subsection to the office:. 231 (1)âAny applicant seeking to operate as a payment 232 instrument seller or money transmitter must provide all of the 233 following information to the office: 234 (a)âA sample authorized vendor contract, if applicable. 235 (2)(b)âA sample form of payment instrument, if applicable. 236 (3)(c)âDocuments demonstrating that the net worth and 237 bonding requirements specified in s. 560.209 have been 238 fulfilled. 239 (4)(d)âA copy of the applicantâs financial audit report for 240 the most recent fiscal year. If the applicant is a wholly owned 241 subsidiary of another corporation, the financial audit report on 242 the parent corporationâs financial statements satisfies this 243 requirement. 244 (2)âAny applicant seeking to operate as a money transmitter 245 that is a custodian of gold coin or silver coin must also 246 provide all of the following additional information to the 247 office: 248 (a)âAll requirements specified in subsection (1). 249 (5)(b)âEvidence, as prescribed by commission rule, 250 demonstrating an applicantâs compliance with s. 560.155(1)(a) 251 (g), if such applicant intends to act as a money transmitter 252 that transmits gold coin or silver coin of: 253 1.âInsurance against loss for all gold coin or silver coin 254 held in its custody; 255 2.âCustody of the exact quantity and type of asset for all 256 of its customersâ gold coin or silver coin held in its physical 257 custody; and 258 3.âDepository accreditation from an entity approved by the 259 office. 260 (c)âA statement of a business plan providing for the safe 261 and sound operation of custodial services pertaining to the 262 storage, security, insurance, auditing, administration, 263 authorized access, transacting, and transfer of gold coin or 264 silver coin to the satisfaction of the office or in accordance 265 with rules adopted by the commission. 266 Section 8.âSection 560.214, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 267 Section 9.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 268 280.21, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 269 280.21âCustodians of gold coin and silver coin.â 270 (1)âA custodian of gold coin or silver coin as defined in 271 s. 560.103 which holds public deposits must do all of the 272 following: 273 (a)âMeet the definition of a qualified public depository as 274 defined in s. 280.02, except that such custodian is not required 275 to be insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or 276 the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund for purposes of 277 holding gold coin or silver coin as defined in s. 215.986. Such 278 custodian must maintain insurance as prescribed in s. 560.214. 279 Section 10.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 280 559.952, Florida Statutes, as amended by chapter 2025-100, Laws 281 of Florida, is amended to read: 282 559.952âFinancial Technology Sandbox.â 283 (4)âEXCEPTIONS TO GENERAL LAW AND WAIVERS OF RULE 284 REQUIREMENTS.â 285 (a)âNotwithstanding any other law, upon approval of a 286 Financial Technology Sandbox application, the following 287 provisions and corresponding rule requirements are not 288 applicable to the licensee during the sandbox period: 289 1.âSection 516.03(1), except for the application fee, the 290 investigation fee, the requirement to provide the social 291 security numbers of control persons, evidence of liquid assets 292 of at least $25,000 or documents satisfying the requirements of 293 s. 516.05(10), and the officeâs authority to investigate the 294 applicantâs background. The office may prorate the license 295 renewal fee for an extension granted under subsection (7). 296 2.âSection 516.05(1) and (2), except that the office shall 297 investigate the applicantâs background. 298 3.âSection 560.109, only to the extent that the section 299 requires the office to examine a licensee at least once every 5 300 years. 301 4.âSection 560.118(2). 302 5.âSection 560.125(1), only to the extent that the 303 subsection would prohibit a licensee from engaging in the 304 business of a money transmitter or payment instrument seller 305 during the sandbox period. 306 6.âSection 560.125(2), only to the extent that the 307 subsection would prohibit a licensee from appointing an 308 authorized vendor during the sandbox period. Any authorized 309 vendor of such a licensee during the sandbox period remains 310 liable to the holder or remitter. 311 7.âSection 560.128. 312 8.âSection 560.141, except for s. 560.141(1)(a)1., 3., 7. 313 10. and (b), (c), and (d). 314 9.âSection 560.142(1) and (2), except that the office may 315 prorate, but may not entirely eliminate, the license renewal 316 fees in s. 560.143 for an extension granted under subsection 317 (7). 318 10.âSection 560.143(2), only to the extent necessary for 319 proration of the renewal fee under subparagraph 9. 320 11.âSection 560.204(1), only to the extent that the 321 subsection would prohibit a licensee from engaging in, or 322 advertising that it engages in, the activity of a payment 323 instrument seller or money transmitter during the sandbox 324 period. 325 12.âSection 560.205(2) Section 560.205 (1)(b). 326 13.âSection 560.208(2). 327 14.âSection 560.209, only to the extent that the office may 328 modify, but may not entirely eliminate, the net worth, corporate 329 surety bond, and collateral deposit amounts required under that 330 section. The modified amounts must be in such lower amounts that 331 the office determines to be commensurate with the factors under 332 paragraph (5)(c) and the maximum number of consumers authorized 333 to receive the financial product or service under this section. 334 Section 11.âParagraphs (a), (b), and (d) of subsection (4) 335 of section 655.97, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 336 655.97âGold and silver coin as legal tender.â 337 (4)âTo the extent that a financial institution accepts gold 338 coin or silver coin deposits or otherwise holds such coin on 339 behalf of its customers, members, or the public, the financial 340 institution must do all of the following: 341 (a)âExcept as provided in s. 560.214, Maintain separate 342 accounts for any gold coin or silver coin and not commingle such 343 gold coin or silver coin with any other accounts that hold coin 344 or currency of the United States or of another country. 345 (b)âInsure the gold coin or silver coin, if not otherwise 346 insured by a custodian of gold coin or silver coin pursuant to 347 s. 560.214(1)(i), for 100 percent of the full replacement value 348 under an all-risk insurance policy issued by a nongovernmental 349 operated insurer that is an authorized insurer or an eligible 350 surplus lines insurer. 351 (d)âComply, or be responsible and accountable for any 352 third-party vendor that stores such gold coin or silver coin on 353 its behalf to comply, with the requirements for a custodian of 354 gold coin or silver coin as provided in s. 560.214. A financial 355 institution regulated under the financial institutions code of 356 this state which acts as a custodian is exempt from obtaining a 357 separate license as a custodian pursuant to s. 560.204(1). 358 Section 12.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.